District of Columbia statutes.
31-3171.17

Rules.

(a)

The Authority, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

The Authority shall submit all proposed rules adopted by the Authority to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution, within this 30-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(c)

Regulations promulgated under this section shall not conflict with or prevent the application of regulations promulgated by the Secretary under the Federal Act.

Mar. 2, 2012, D.C. Law 19-94, § 18, 59 DCR 213